Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202079-932
Retirement; deferment of payment; board; duties.

(1) Payment of any benefit provided under the retirement system shall not be deferred later than the required beginning date.

(2) The board shall make reasonable efforts to locate the member or the member's beneficiary and distribute benefits by the required beginning date. If the board is unable to make such a distribution, the benefit shall be distributed pursuant to the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act and no amounts may be applied to increase the benefits any member would otherwise receive under the School Employees Retirement Act.

Laws 1945, c. 219, § 22, p. 645;

R.S.Supp.,1947, § 79-2922;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 455, p. 847;

Laws 1951, c. 291, § 3, p. 966;

Laws 1969, c. 735, § 5, p. 2779;

Laws 1975, LB 44, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 391, § 6;

Laws 1981, LB 463, § 1;

Laws 1982, LB 287, § 4;

Laws 1986, LB 311, § 17;

Laws 1987, LB 296, § 3;

Laws 1987, LB 549, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1521;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 567;

Laws 2003, LB 451, § 19;

Laws 2020, LB1054, § 8.
July 25, 2020
Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act, see section 69-1329.